North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55A. North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act.
Part 2. Members’ Rights and Obligations.

§ 55A-6-20.
Designations, qualifications, rights, and obligations of members.

If a corporation has members, the designations, qualifications, rights, and obligations of members shall be set forth in or authorized by the articles of incorporation or bylaws, and may include any provisions not inconsistent with law or the articles of incorporation with respect to:

Conditions of admission and membership;

Voting rights and the manner of exercising voting rights;

The relative rights and obligations of members among themselves, to the corporation, and with respect to the property of the corporation;

The manner of terminating membership in the corporation;

The rights and obligations of the members and the corporation upon such termination;

The transferability or nontransferability of memberships; and

Any other matters.

Except as otherwise provided in or authorized by the articles of incorporation or bylaws, all members shall have the same designations, qualifications, rights, and obligations.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 35; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

Any rights or obligations of a member, and any differentiation of designations, qualifications, rights and obligations among members, must be prescribed pursuant to this section. Except for certain procedural or auxiliary rights, such as the right to bring a derivative action or to inspect corporate records, a member does not have any rights or obligations, such as the right to vote, solely by reason of being a member; and, conversely, G.S. 55A-1-40(16) provides that a person is not a member solely by reason of having voting or other rights normally associated with membership. Thus, for example, there can be voting nonmembers as well as nonvoting members.

§ 55A-6-21.
Prohibition of stock.

A corporation shall neither authorize nor issue shares of stock.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 32; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

G.S. 55-17-01(b) prohibits the formation of nonprofit corporations with capital stock under Chapter 55. G.S. 55-17-01(a) provides that domestic nonprofit corporations with capital stock organized prior to July 1, 1957 under former Chapter 55 or its predecessor are governed by Chapter 55. But, under the provisions of G.S. 55A-1-40(11) and G.S. 55A-15-01(a), foreign nonprofit corporations with capital stock are governed by Chapter 55A if they are conducting affairs in North Carolina.

§ 55A-6-22.
Member’s liability to third parties.

A member of a corporation is not, as such, personally liable for the acts, debts, liabilities, or obligations or corporation.

History.

1993, c. 398, s. 1.

§ 55A-6-23.
Member’s liability for dues, assessments, and fees.

A member may become liable to the corporation for dues, assessments, or fees; provided, however, that a provision in the articles of incorporation or bylaws or a resolution adopted by the board of directors authorizing or imposing dues, assessments, or fees does not, of itself, create liability.

History.

1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

Under this section, a member must agree or consent, explicitly or implicitly, to become liable for dues, assessments or fees.

§ 55A-6-24.
Creditor’s action against member.

A creditor of a corporation shall not bring a proceeding to enforce any liability of a member to the corporation unless final judgment has been rendered in favor of the creditor against the corporation and execution has been returned unsatisfied in whole or in part or unless a proceeding against the corporation would be futile.

All creditors of the corporation, with or without reducing their claims to judgment, may intervene in any creditor’s proceeding brought under subsection (a) of this section to collect and apply the proceeds of obligations owed to the corporation. Any or all members who are indebted to the corporation may be joined in such proceeding.

History.

1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

This section is intended to protect members and not to create any new cause of action in favor of creditors.

§§ 55A-6-25 through 55A-6-29.

Reserved for future codification purposes.